Maryland, session 2026, HB1087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 10. SURGICAL SMOKE EVACUATION SYSTEMS.
19–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(1) A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) A LIMITED SERVICE HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS
TITLE;
(3) A RELATED INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
(4) AN AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY; OR
(5) A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 19–3A–01
OF THIS TITLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 794 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) “SMOKE EVACUATION SYSTEM” MEANS EQUIPMENT THAT EFFECTIVELY
CAPTURES AND FILTERS SURGICAL SMOKE AT THE SITE OF ORIGIN BEFORE THE
SURGICAL SMOKE MAKES CONTACT WITH THE EYES OR RESPIRATORY TRACT OF
OCCUPANTS IN THE ROOM.
(D) “SURGICAL SMOKE” MEANS THE GASEOUS BY–PRODUCT PRODUCED BY
ENERGY–GENERATING DEVICES, INCLUDING SURGICAL PLUME, SMOKE PLUME,
BIO–AEROSOLS, LASER–GENERATED AIRBORNE CONTAMINANTS, OR
LUNG–DAMAGING DUST.
19–1002.
BY JANUARY 1, 2028, EACH HEALTH CARE FACILITY THAT PERFORMS
SURGICAL PROCEDURES SHALL ADOPT AND IMPLEMENT POLICIES THAT REQUIRE
THE USE OF A SMOKE EVACUATION SYSTEM DURING A SURGICAL PROCEDURE THAT
MAY GENERATE SURGICAL SMOKE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –